Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-202. Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Accumulated contributions” means the total of all amounts contributed by a member credited to the member's deposit account, together with regular interest;

“Active member” means any member eligible for service credit rendering service to an employer that is covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Actual service” means service rendered in a position covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and does not include purchased or free credited service or reciprocal service;

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal reserve value when reserve is the present value of all payment to be made on account of any benefit based upon such reasonable rate of interest and table of experience as a plan shall adopt from time to time;

“Administrator” means:

A person who is:

Employed by an education-related agency that participates in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

An active member employed in a position that is a grade GS13, a grade above a GS13, or the equivalent of a grade GS13; or

A person who is:

Employed by a participating employer of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

Any one (1) of the following:

A public school superintendent, assistant superintendent, principal, or vice principal;

A president, chancellor, or a director of an institution of higher education; or

A president, vice president, or a director of a community college vocational, technical, or educational cooperative;

“Annuity” means an amount payable to a retirant each fiscal year by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System in equal monthly installments;

“Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” means a governmental state agency created in 1973 and administered under Acts 1973, No. 427, as amended, to provide a system of retirement benefits to its members and includes a limited liability company or other corporate entity solely owned by the system;

“Beneficiary” means any person who is receiving or is designated by a member to receive an Arkansas Teacher Retirement System benefit;

“Benefit participant” means a person or entity that receives or may receive any kind of benefit, annuity, or other payment from the system due to a member's participation in the system.

“Benefit participant” includes without limitation:

A member;

A spouse or a member;

A survivor;

A residual beneficiary;

A death beneficiary;

A former spouse of a member; and

The estate of a member;

“Benefit program” means a schedule of benefits or benefit formulas from which the amounts of Arkansas Teacher Retirement System benefits can be determined;

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Child of a member” means either a natural child of the member or a child who has been made a child of the member by applicable court action before the death of the member;

“Credited service” means service which is creditable as service by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Deferred member” means an inactive member who is eligible to receive benefits under § 24-7-707;

“De minimis amount” means an amount of money so small as to make accounting for it unreasonable or impractical;

“Employee” means any person employed by an employer covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Employer” or “covered employer” means any public school, public educational agency, or other eligible employer participating in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System unless the context clearly indicates that the employer is not a covered employer;

“Employment with a school” means, beginning July 1, 1993:

Employment with any of the following institutions or agencies:

Arkansas School for the Blind;

Arkansas School for the Deaf;

Arkansas Activities Association;

State Board of Education;

Regional education service cooperatives; and

Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

Employment in a position with any of the following organizations:

The Arkansas Educational Television Commission; and

Area vocational-technical schools, except those employees of area vocational schools and the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, who have elected to participate in an alternate retirement plan established by §§ 24-7-901 and 24-7-903 — 24-7-908;

Employment by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services except those employees who have elected to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

Employment in a position with an educationally related agency if the employee is or has been a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for a minimum of five (5) years and elects to become or remain a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. The employment shall be related to:

Training public school employees or school board members;

Teaching public school students; or

Adult education programs.

The employment shall not be related in any manner to private schools.

Each educationally related agency shall be:

Approved according to rules established by the board;

Considered an employer under subdivision (17) of this section; and

Responsible for all required employer contributions;

Employment in an enterprise privatized by a public school district.

If a public school district should privatize any of its services, any individual who is or was employed by the school district in one (1) of those services and who is or has been a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may elect to remain a member if:

The board determines pursuant to rules adopted by the board that the participation of these employees in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System will not in any way impair any legal status of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, including without limitation its status as a governmental plan pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code and the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or have a substantial adverse impact on the actuarial soundness of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

The private provider assumes all responsibility for the required employer contributions and any fees for obtaining Internal Revenue Service rulings or Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 opinions;

Employment in positions with an educational nonprofit corporation licensed and regulated by the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of Human Services, if:

The nonprofit corporation has elected to participate in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

The board determines pursuant to rules adopted by the board that the participation of the educational nonprofit corporation will not in any way impair any legal status of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, including without limitation its status as a governmental plan pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or have a substantial adverse impact on the actuarial soundness of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The employment shall be related to:

Training public school employees or school board members;

Teaching public school students; or

Adult education programs.

The employment shall not be related in any manner to private schools.

Each educational nonprofit corporation shall be:

Approved according to rules established by the board;

Considered an employer under subdivision (17) of this section; and

Responsible for all required employer contributions and any fees for obtaining Internal Revenue Service rulings or Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 opinions; and

Employment with a covered employer that elects to treat embedded employees of a contractor as members of the system;

“Final average salary” means the average of the highest salaries earned by a member in state fiscal years determined in accordance with the rules of the board as is actuarially appropriate for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Inactive member” means a formerly active member who is:

No longer rendering service that is covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

Not a retirant;

“Interest” means the rate or rates per annum, compounded annually, as the board shall adopt from time to time, that will be charged for the purchase of service credit or to repay a refund, or repayment of benefits, but the rate shall equal no less than the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's current assumed interest rate assumption;

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., as amended, as it existed on January 1, 2013;

“Look-back period” means a period of time that includes the current fiscal year and the four (4) fiscal years immediately preceding the current fiscal year;

“Manifest injustice” means an obvious unfairness that has a direct and observable unconscionable effect that will occur as a result of a technical error or error of judgment, when the error made by the system, a benefit participant, or employer, and the disparity of outcome to the parties, when taken together and supported by clear and convincing evidence, show a great harm to the integrity of the system as a whole, the benefit participant, or an employer, unless the system is afforded the discretion to resolve the matter in a fair manner.

In determining manifest injustice the system may consider:

The degree of fault of the system, benefit participant, or employer;

An ambiguity in the interpretation of the circumstances, rule, or law;

The cost to the system of correcting the error that is far outweighed by the benefit afforded to the system, benefit participant, or employer;

Whether or not an expedited decision is in the public interest;

The fundamental fairness of a remedy in a particular situation; and

Whether or not the status quo would result in an unconscionable outcome;

“Member” means any person included in the membership of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Nonteacher” means a member who is not a teacher;

“Normal retirement age” means sixty-five (65) years of age;

“Reciprocal service” means credited service rendered under a reciprocal system as defined by § 24-2-401;

“Regular interest” means the rate or rates per annum, compounded annually, which the board shall adopt from time to time, that will be used to compute interest on members' contributions;

“Reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any Arkansas Teacher Retirement System benefit based upon such reasonable tables of experience and regular interest as the board shall adopt from time to time;

“Retiree” or “retirant” means a member receiving an Arkansas Teacher Retirement System annuity;

“Retires” means that a member ceases to be active and is eligible to receive retirement benefits from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Salary” means the remuneration paid to a member employed in a position covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System on which the employer is required to withhold federal income tax from wages or on which income tax would be due under the Internal Revenue Code.

“Salary” includes:

An incentive bonus paid to an employee for the employee's certification by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards under § 6-17-413 if the Department of Education pays the employer contribution and the member pays the required member contribution; and

Employer pick-up contributions, cafeteria plans as defined in § 21-5-901, and employee contributions to qualified retirement plans, including without limitation qualified annuities and deferred compensation plans.

“Salary” does not include:

All or part of a payment made as a result of a contract buyout agreement, settlement, claim, judgment, arbitration award, decree, or court-ordered payment to a member; and

Nonmonetary taxable income, including without limitation vehicles, housing, and personal property.

The board may promulgate rules to modify the definition of salary used in the calculation of benefits by the system;

“School” means any public school under the control of school authorities of the state and supported wholly or partially by state moneys;

“Service” means employment rendered as an employee;

“Service purchase account” means an account established by a member with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to allow the member to buy service credit in the system as allowed under this subchapter.

“Service purchase account” does not include an account established by the system to allow a member to make payments on unreported or incorrectly reported contributory service credit that is not resolved through a release process;

“Social Security” means the Social Security, old age, survivors', and disability insurance program;

“State” means the State of Arkansas;

“System” means the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“T-DROP” means the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“T-DROP plan interest” means the rate per annum that the board shall adopt from time to time that will be used to compute interest paid on T-DROP mean balances at the end of each fiscal year;

“Teacher” means, beginning July 1, 1989, any person employed by a school for the purpose of giving instructions and whose employment requires state licensure.

In any case of a question as to who is a teacher, the board shall have the final power to decide the question; and

“Trustee” means a member of the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 2; 1983, No. 619, § 1; 1983, No. 665, § 1; 1985, No. 805, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1437; Acts 1989, No. 652, § 1; 1989, No. 653, § 1; 1993, No. 435, § 1; 1993, No. 897, § 1; 1995, No. 460, § 1; 1995, No. 542, § 1; 1995, No. 638, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 142, § 1; 1997, No. 1064, § 1; 1997, No. 1137, § 3; 1999, No. 11, § 1; 1999, No. 865, § 3; 2001, No. 155, § 1; 2001, No. 461, § 1; 2005, No. 71, § 1; 2005, No. 146, § 2; 2005, No. 2190, § 23; 2007, No. 97, § 1; 2007, No. 617, § 44; 2009, No. 468, § 1; 2009, No. 1325, § 1; 2009, No. 1326, § 2; 2011, No. 45, § 1; 2011, No. 69, §§ 3, 4; 2011, No. 138, § 1; 2011, No. 163, § 1; 2011, No. 225, § 1; 2013, No. 140, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 303, § 1; 2013, No. 521, § 1; 2015, No. 301, § 1; 2017, No. 293, §§
1, 2; 2017, No. 436, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 575, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2882, 2883; 2019, No. 427, §§ 2-5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2369, 2370.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 468 rewrote (5); inserted “or other eligible employer” in (13); in (14), deleted (14)(A)(iv) and (14)(B)(i), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions, deleted “or the Division of State Services for the Blind of the Department of Human Services” following “Education” and “the noncontributory plan of” following “participate in” in (14)(C), and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (14)(E)(ii)

(a)

and (14)(F)(i)

(b)

; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1325 rewrote (15)(A)(i); substituted “January 1, 2009” for “January 1, 2007” in (18); deleted “former” preceding “member” in (25); rewrote (27); and made minor stylistic changes in (15)(A)(ii), (15)(B), and (16).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1326 added the (27)(A)(i)

(a)

designation; and added (27)(A)(i)

(b)

The 2011 amendment by No. 45 inserted “eligible for service credit” in (2).

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 added “when reserve is the present value ... as a plan shall adopt from time to time” in (4); and added (37).

The 2011 amendment by No. 138 added (38) and (39).

The 2011 amendment by No. 163 inserted “for on-site work” in (27)(B)(ii).

The 2011 amendment by No. 225 rewrote (27).

The 2013 amendment by No. 140 substituted “January 1, 2013” for “January 1, 2009” in (19); in (28)(A), substituted “is required to withhold” for “withholds” and added “from wages under the Internal Revenue Code.”

The 2013 amendment by No. 303 added (40).

The 2013 amendment by No. 521, in (30)(A), substituted “is required to withhold” for “withholds” and added “from wages under the Internal Revenue Code”; inserted “if the Department of Education pays the employer contribution and the member pays the required member contribution” in (30)(B)(i); and added (C) and (D).

The 2015 amendment inserted the definitions for “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” and “De minimis amount.”

The 2017 amendment by No. 293, in the definition for “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System”, inserted “governmental” and added “and includes a limited liability company or other corporate entity solely owned by the system”; and, in the definition for “Employer”, inserted “or ‘covered employer’” and added “unless the context clearly indicates that the employer is not a covered employer”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 436 inserted “or on which income tax would be due” in present (33)(A); and deleted “on which the employer is required to withhold federal income tax from wages unless the amount paid to the member is higher than the wages earned by the member for regular service” from the end of present (33)(C)(i).

The 2017 amendment by No. 575 added present (18)(G).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in present (18)(D)(iii)

(a)

and present (19).

The 2019 amendment by No. 427 added the definition for “Administrator”; rewrote present (19); added “Retiree” to the defined term “Retirant”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education, Adult Education Section of the Division of Workforce Services, and the Office of Skills Development” for “Department of Career Education” in present (18)(B)(ii) and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Career Education” following “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the” in present (18)(C).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-201.

U.S. Code.

The Social Security Act is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq. The Internal Revenue Code of 1986 is codified throughout Title 26 of the U.S. Code.

Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in this section is codified as 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17).

The Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, referred to in this section, is primarily codified as 26 U.S.C. § 401 et seq. and 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

24-7-203. Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or who falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records in an attempt to defraud the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1444; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 207.

24-7-204. Tax status of system assets.

The assets of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are exempt from taxes by the state, any political subdivision, or an agency thereof.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 10; 1985, No. 486, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1444.

Cross References.

Income tax exemption for retirement or disability benefits, § 26-51-307.

24-7-205. Correction of errors.

If a change, omission, or error in the records of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System results in a benefit participant, employer, or the system having received an overpayment or underpayment of any obligation, liability, contribution, or other right to payment more or less than what would have been paid or received if the records had been correct, the system or its designee shall correct the record and, as far as practicable, shall adjust the obligation, liability, contribution, or other right to payment.

A refund payable to a benefit participant shall be paid based on the corrected record.

The system may withhold an amount owed to the system from a benefit participant to correct an overpayment made to the benefit participant.

If a benefit participant has a balance due to the system or receives any benefit or other distribution by the system to which the benefit participant is not entitled or the benefit participant or employer has an unpaid obligation to the system, the system or its designee, under rules adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, may:

Withhold the amount due from any benefit or payment due the benefit participant;

Collect the amount in any other manner provided by law; or

Cancel any contributory service credit for the fiscal year for which there is a member contribution balance due to the system, if the member that owes the member contribution balance elects to have the system cancel the contributory service rather than pay the balance due.

If contributory service credit is canceled under subdivision (b)(1)(C)(i) of this section, the system shall return any member contributions for the affected portion of that fiscal year without interest.

Withheld amounts shall be used to effect repayment until the total amount withheld equals all amounts payable by the benefit participant to the system.

Before making an adjustment of benefits or pursuing any other collection action under this section, the system or its designee shall provide notice to the benefit participant or employer.

The notice shall describe the process for disputing an adjustment of benefits.

The board or its designee may waive adjustment or repayment due to the system, including interest, if:

The error was not the result of the benefit participant's or employer's intentional nondisclosure, fraud, misrepresentation, or other fault; and

The board or its designee finds in his or her or its sole discretion that recovery of the amount owed to the system will result in a manifest injustice.

A determination, review, administrative action, cause of action, request to enforce, change, or modify an obligation, duty, benefit calculation, designation, refund, contribution, service credit, or other right arising under this subchapter shall not be valid unless commenced within the look-back period unless the system determines that the justification to commence the process is due to intentional nondisclosure, fraud, misrepresentation, criminal act, or an obvious or documented error by an employer or the system that understated the service credit of a member upon which all required contributions have been paid.

The board or its designee may make adjustments to the employer, member, and system records beyond the look-back period if the board determines that the time limitation imposed by the look-back period will result in a manifest injustice in a specific case.

The board or its designee may waive or modify the impact of a rule, provision, or law that does not violate federal law or jeopardize the tax-qualified status of the system to correct or prevent a manifest injustice that would affect the system, benefit participant, or employer in a particular instance.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1444; Acts 2005, No. 1026, § 1; 2009, No. 465, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 2; 2011, No. 138, § 2; 2013, No. 303, § 2; 2013, No. 336, § 1; 2017, No. 241, §
1; 2019, No. 85, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 465 added (c).

The 2009 amendment by No. 468 substituted “system” for “the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” in (a); substituted “a member, a retirant, an annuitant, a beneficiary or an alternate payee receiving benefits or other distributions” for “any person's receiving” in (a); in (b), in (b)(1) deleted “former member, contributor, former contributor” following “member,” inserted “an annuitant,” and substituted “other distribution” for “payment” in (b)(1), and substituted “system” for “board” in (b)(1) and (b)(3)(A).

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 303 added (e).

The 2013 amendment by No. 336 substituted “has a balance due to the system or receives” for “is paid” in the introductory language of (b)(1); and added (b)(1)(C).

The 2017 amendment added “or an obvious or documented error by an employer or the system that understated the service credit of a member upon which all required contributions have been paid” to the end of (c).

The 2019 amendment inserted “contributory” throughout (b)(1)(C); inserted “member contribution” twice in (b)(1)(C)(i); inserted “portion of that” in (b)(1)(C)(ii); and deleted “Except for member contributions” from the beginning of (b)(4).

24-7-206. Withholding association membership dues.

Upon receipt of a written request signed by a retiree who is receiving an annuity from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the retirement system shall withhold membership dues of the Arkansas Education Association - Retired, the National Education Association - Retired, and the Arkansas Retired Teachers' Association from the monthly annuity checks of the retiree.

The withholding request authorized by this section shall be on forms provided to retirees by the system.

After a withholding request is received by the system and after withholding of a retiree's dues is started under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, it shall be discontinued only upon receipt of a written notice of cancellation signed by the retiree.

The system shall transmit all dues which are withheld under the provisions of this section to the Arkansas Education Association - Retired, the National Education Association - Retired, and the Arkansas Retired Teachers' Association after each monthly payroll is made to retirees.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 105, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-1475 — 80-1477; Acts 1989, No. 376, § 1.

24-7-207. Increase in benefit amount.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is authorized by this act to raise the level of benefits to the current retirants and other beneficiaries of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to a comparable level increase to match the increase in benefits that would accrue to active members as a result of any reduction of the calculation of “final average salary” to not less than a three-year period nor more than the five-year period in accordance with any rules the board might promulgate.

The amount of any increase for retirants and other beneficiaries shall also be determined in accordance with the rules of the board as is actuarially appropriate for the system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1137, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2884.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (b).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1997, No. 1137, codified as §§ 24-3-102(8) [repealed], 24-4-101(4), 24-7-202(19), 24-7-207, 24-7-208.

24-7-208. Benefit enhancements — Restrictions.

No benefit enhancement provided for by this act shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed an eighteen-year amortization.

No benefit enhancement provided for by this act shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding eighteen (18) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1137, § 5; 2019, No. 427, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “an eighteen-year amortization” for “a thirty-year amortization” in (a); and substituted “eighteen (18) years” for “thirty (30) years” in (b).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-207.

24-7-209. Suspension of benefit payments upon request.

Subject to the minimum distribution provisions of § 24-7-730, a person entitled to receive an annuity may submit a request to the system in writing, for personal reasons and without disclosure thereof, to suspend the payment of all the benefit otherwise payable to him or her by the system.

Upon receipt of the request, the system shall authorize the suspension, and the person shall be deemed to have forfeited all rights to the benefit so suspended but shall have the right to have the full benefit otherwise payable reinstated as to future monthly payment upon written notice to the system to revoke the prior request for suspension under this section.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 29, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 2.

24-7-210. Federal taxation.

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is authorized and directed to operate the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and interpret any provisions of § 24-7-101 et seq. consistent with the requirements under the Internal Revenue Code and applicable United States Department of the Treasury regulations necessary to permit the system to be operated as a “qualified trust” under Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a).

Notwithstanding any language to the contrary set forth in this chapter, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall have the authority to promulgate rules consistent with these directions.

Any rule promulgated under this section that is found to be in conflict with an applicable provision of the code is null and void.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 2; 2005, No. 71, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2885.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c).

24-7-211. Appeals.

A benefit participant or employer may appeal a final administrative decision of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System by filing a complaint in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 45, § 1.